zh-CN: 牙科护齿器牙弓覆盖: 双牙弓; 全口; 下牙弓; 上牙弓; 其他
vi: Phạm vi cung răng của bảo vệ miệng: Hai hàm; Toàn miệng; Hàm dưới; Hàm trên; Khác
sk-SK: Pokrytie oblúka zubného chrániča: Dvojoblúkový; Celé ústa; Dolný oblúk; Horný oblúk; Iné
sl-SI: Pokritost zobnega loka z ustnim ščitnikom: Dvojni lok; Polna usta; Spodnji lok; Zgornji lok; Drugo
de: Zahnschutz-Zahnbogenabdeckung: Doppelkiefer; Vollmund; Unterkiefer; Oberkiefer; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Acoperire arcadă proteza dentară: Arcade duble; Gură completă; Arcadă inferioară; Arcadă superioară; Altele
ja: 歯科マウスガードアーチカバレッジ: デュアルアーチ; フルマウス; 下部アーチ; 上部アーチ; その他
tr: Diş koruyucu ark kapsamı: Çift çene; Tam ağız; Alt çene; Üst çene; Diğer
bg-BG: Покритие на зъбната дъга от предпазителя за уста: Двойна дъга; Пълна уста; Долна дъга; Горна дъга; Други
ko: 치과 마우스가드 아치 커버리지: 듀얼 아치; 전체 구강; 하악궁; 상악궁; 기타
lt-LT: Dantų apsaugos lanko aprėptis: Dvigubo lanko; Visos burnos; Apatinio lanko; Viršutinio lanko; Kita
ru: Покрытие зубной дуги капой: Двухчелюстная; Полный рот; Нижняя челюсть; Верхняя челюсть; Другой
el: Κάλυψη οδοντικού τόξου νάρθηκα: Διπλή αψίδα; Πλήρες στόμα; Κάτω αψίδα; Άνω αψίδα; Άλλο
pl: Zakres pokrycia łuków przez ochraniacz na zęby: Oba łuki; Pełne usta; Łuk dolny; Łuk górny; Inne
hr-HR: Pokrivanje luka dentalnog štitnika za usta: Dvostruki luk; Cijela usta; Donji luk; Gornji luk; Ostalo
zh-TW: 牙弓覆蓋範圍: 雙弓; 全口; 下弓; 上弓; 其他
sv: Tandskyddets bågtäckning: Dubbelkäke; Hela munnen; Underkäke; Överkäke; Övrigt
nb: Tannbittvern buedekning: Dobbel bue; Full munn; Nedre bue; Øvre bue; Annet
pt-PT: Cobertura de arco do protetor bucal dentário: Dupla arcada; Boca completa; Arcada inferior; Arcada superior; Outro
cs: Pokrytí oblouku zubního chrániče: Dvojitý oblouk; Celá ústa; Dolní oblouk; Horní oblouk; Jiné
th: การครอบคลุมโค้งฟันของเฝือกฟัน: สองขากรรไกร; ปากเต็ม; ขากรรไกรล่าง; ขากรรไกรบน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Cobertura do arco do protetor bucal odontológico: Arcada dupla; Boca completa; Arcada inferior; Arcada superior; Outro
hu: Fogvédő fogívfedés: Kettős ív; Teljes száj; Alsó ív; Felső ív; Egyéb
en: Dental mouthguard arch coverage: Dual arch; Full mouth; Lower arch; Upper arch; Other
da: Tandbeskytterens tandbuedækning: Dobbeltbue; Hel mund; Nedre bue; Øvre bue; Andet
fr: Protection de l’arcade dentaire par le protège-dents: Double arcade; Bouche complète; Arcade inférieure; Arcade supérieure; Autre
it: Copertura dell'arcata del paradenti dentale: Doppia arcata; Bocca completa; Arcata inferiore; Arcata superiore; Altro
nl: Tandboogdekking gebitsbeschermer: Dubbele kaak; Volledige mond; Onderkaak; Bovenkaak; Andere
fi: Hammassuojan kaaren peitto: Kaksikaari; Koko suu; Alakaari; Yläkaari; Muu
es: Cobertura del arco del protector bucal dental: Arco dual; Boca completa; Arco inferior; Arco superior; Otros